New York, session 2025-2026, A2184.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. African American history and achievement. 1. The commission on 4 African American history and achievement; established. (a) The commis- 5 sion on African American history and achievement, referred to in this 6 section as the commission, is hereby created and established. The 7 commission shall consist of thirteen members, including the commission- 8 er, or their designee, the chancellor of New York city schools, or their 9 designee, the chancellor of the state university of New York, or their 10 designee, and the chancellor of the board of regents, or their designee, 11 three members appointed by the governor, three members appointed by the 12 temporary president of the senate, and three members appointed by the 13 speaker of the assembly. Appointed members shall include but not be 14 limited to teachers, including kindergarten through twelve educators, 15 historians, and those with a background in African American history, 16 arts, or culture. 17 (b) Each member shall serve for a term of three years and shall be 18 eligible for reappointment. A vacancy occurring other than by expiration 19 of term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment 20 for the unexpired term. 21 (c) The members of the commission shall serve without compensation but 22 shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary expenses incurred 23 in the performance of their duties. 24 (d) The commissioner, or their designee, shall serve as the chair and 25 the chancellor of New York city schools, or their designee, shall serve EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01959-01-5 A. 2184 2 1 as the vice-chair of the commission. The presence of a majority of the 2 authorized membership of the commission shall be required for the 3 conduct of official business. 4 (e) The department shall provide technical assistance and data to the 5 commission as may be necessary for the commission to carry out its 6 responsibilities pursuant to this section. 7 2. Duties and responsibilities of the commission. (a) The commission 8 shall be tasked with developing and recommending curriculum that incor- 9 porates the contributions and achievements made by African Americans as 10 part of New York's education curriculum, including but not limited to 11 the women's abolitionist movement, the Harlem Renaissance, the Buffalo 12 anti-slavery movement, and the suffrage movement for African American 13 Long Islanders. In furtherance of this goal, the commission shall have 14 the following duties and responsibilities: 15 (i) To survey and review current elementary and secondary education 16 curriculum as it relates to contributions and achievements of African 17 Americans throughout American and state history; 18 (ii) To develop recommendations on additional curriculum and instruc- 19 tion for grades kindergarten through twelve that incorporate the 20 contributions and achievements made by African Americans throughout 21 American and New York state history; and 22 (iii) Prepare reports for the governor and legislature regarding its 23 findings and recommendations on current curriculum and incorporating 24 additional instruction on the contributions and achievements made by 25 African Americans throughout American and New York state history. 26 (b) The commission shall submit an annual report, beginning August 27 first, two thousand twenty-six, to the governor, the commissioner, the 28 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the 29 chair of the senate education committee, and the chair of the assembly 30 education committee on its findings and recommendations. 31 3. African American history and achievement curriculum or instruction. 32 (a) The commissioner, in conjunction with other appropriate agencies, 33 shall establish African American history and achievement curriculum or 34 instruction for school districts based on the recommendations of the 35 commission. The content shall be age appropriate and shall be developed 36 according to the needs and abilities of pupils at successive grade 37 levels in order to provide materials, and information in African Ameri- 38 can history and achievement. The commissioner shall annually review the 39 commission's recommendations and make updates to curriculum as appropri- 40 ate. 41 (b) Schools may include the above materials as a component of its 42 history curriculum or any other way the school deems appropriate. 43 § 2. Section 2590-h of the education law is amended by adding a new 44 subdivision 57 to read as follows: 45 57. Ensure that all students in the city district, the charter schools 46 in the city of New York authorized by article fifty-six of this title, 47 and the nonpublic schools in the city of New York providing instruction 48 in accordance with section thirty-two hundred four of this chapter, as 49 part of the instruction in awareness of African American history since 50 the year sixteen hundred nineteen pursuant to section eight hundred 51 nineteen of this chapter, shall visit sites which educate about these 52 historical events. 53 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 54 the amendments to section 2590-h of the education law made by section 55 two of this act shall not affect the expiration and reversion of such 56 section and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith.